Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB770.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2007-H. Notice of tuition increase.(a) Requirement.--If an institution of higher education increases tuition from the prior academic year, the institution of higher education shall send notice of the tuition increase electronically and by mail to all enrolled students of the institution of higher education at least 45 days prior to any bill for tuition.(b) Contents.--The notice under subsection (a) must include:(1) T he tuition amount for the prior academic year. 1234567891011121314151617181920 (2) The current tuition amount.(3) The dollar and percent amount of the tuition increase.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0770PN0751 - 2 - 1234